Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 4

Transfers from Department of Correction and Department of Children's Services

33-3-401. Mentally ill or intellectually disabled
minors in youth development centers.

If the chief officer of a youth development center of the department of children's services determines, on the basis of a written report of a licensed physician or licensed psychologist designated as a health service provider, that a person in the youth development center:

Has serious emotional disturbance, mental illness, or intellectual disability; and

Is in need of residential care and treatment for the condition that cannot be provided by the department of children's services and that can be provided at a residential facility of the department of mental health and substance abuse services or the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, the chief officer of the youth development center shall order the person's transfer and shall notify the person of the decision and the reasons in writing not less than twenty-four (24) hours in advance of the proposed transfer.

If the person does not object to the transfer within twenty-four (24) hours of notice of the proposed transfer, the person shall be transferred to the appropriate residential program of the department of mental health and substance abuse services or the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities that is designated by the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services or the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities as having available suitable accommodations. The department of children's services shall retain legal custody of the person after the person has been transferred to an appropriate residential program of the department of mental health and substance abuse services or the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities.

If the person objects to the transfer within twenty-four (24) hours of notice of the proposed transfer, the chief officer of the youth development center shall convene a transfer committee not less than seven (7) nor more than fourteen (14) days thereafter, and the person shall remain in the youth development center pending the decision of the transfer committee.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 34; 1989, ch. 278, § 30; 1989, ch. 513, § 5; 1992, ch. 991, § 13; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 40-42; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6; 2010, ch. 734, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 36; 2012, ch. 575, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 33-3-101 — 33-3-112, 33-3-201 — 33-3-203, 33-3-301 — 33-3-303, 33-3-401 — 33-3-412, 33-3-501 — 504, 33-3-601 — 33-3-603, 33-3-605 — 33-3-19, 33-3-623, 33-3-701 — 33-3-711, 33-3-801, 33-3-901 — 33-3-908 (Acts 1955, ch. 187, § 1; 1965, ch. 38, §§ 4-7, 16-19, 23-26; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 17-20, 22-25, 29-32; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 5-7, 11; 1976, ch. 489, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 763, §§ 1, 2, 10; 1977, ch. 482, § 11; 1978, ch. 533, §§ 3-5; 1978, ch. 533, § 7; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 366, § 15; 1980, ch. 838, § 5; 1983, ch. 323, § 4-7, 9, 12, 15, 16; T.C.A. §§ 33-303 — 33-307, 33-309 — 33-312, 33-317 — 33-320, 33-330 — 33-337, 33-345 — 33-347, 33-355, 33-360 — 33-362, 33-364 — 33-378, 33-382, 33-610, 33-1101; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 2-5, 7, 16-23, 34; 1984, ch. 986, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 6-13, 33; 1986, ch. 570, §§ 2-4; 1986, ch. 836, § 3, 5; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 2, 3, 7; 1988, ch. 828, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, §§ 30-33; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 2, 5-13; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 29-31, 113; 1992, ch. 991, § 13; 1993, ch. 66, § 44; 1993, ch. 439, § 1; 1993, ch. 356, § 4; 1994, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 743, § 1; 1995, ch. 320, § 1; 1995, ch. 411, § 1; 1996, ch. 669, § 1; 1996, ch. 675, § 15; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 31-47, 49-56; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-3-304 (Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 20; T.C.A., § 33-702), which was previously repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33; § 33-3-604 (Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 9; T.C.A., § 33-363), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33; § 33-3-620, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(e) and (f) in 1984; § 33-3-621, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(g) in 1984; and § 33-3-622, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(h) in 1984, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Family support programs and services, title 33, ch. 5, part 2.

Judicial review of transfer, § 33-3-701.

Placement of juveniles, title 37, ch. 2.

Law Reviews.

Problem of Age and Jurisdiction in the Juvenile Court (C. William Reiney), 19 Vand. L. Rev. 833 (1966).

33-3-402. Mentally ill or intellectually disabled
adult inmates.

If the director of a facility of the department of correction determines, on the basis of a written report of a licensed physician or a licensed psychologist with health service provider designation, that a person in the director's custody:

Has mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or intellectual disability; and

Is in need of residential care and treatment for the condition that cannot be provided at an appropriate facility of the department of correction and that can be provided at an appropriate residential program of the department of mental health and substance abuse services or the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, the director shall order the person's transfer and shall notify the person of the decision and the reasons in writing not less than twenty-four (24) hours in advance of the proposed transfer.

If the person is competent and waives in writing the right to a transfer hearing, the person shall be transferred to the custody of the commissioner at a secure facility that is designated by the commissioner as having available suitable accommodations.

If the person does not so waive the right to a hearing, the director shall convene a transfer committee not less than seven (7) nor more than fourteen (14) days thereafter, and the person shall remain in the facility of the department of correction pending the decision of the transfer committee.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 34; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6; 2004, ch. 565, § 6; 2010, ch. 734, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 37; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

33-3-403. Emergency residential care and treatment.

If the director of a facility of the department of correction determines, on the basis of a written report of a licensed physician or a licensed psychologist designated as a health service provider, that a person in the director's custody:

Has mental illness or serious emotional disturbance; and

Is in need of emergency residential care and treatment for the condition that cannot be provided at an appropriate facility of the department of correction and that can be provided at an appropriate residential program of the department of mental health and substance abuse services, the director shall immediately have the person transferred to the custody of the commissioner at a facility designated by the commissioner.

When a person is transferred from the department of correction to the department of mental health and substance abuse services under this section, the chief officer of the receiving facility shall convene a transfer committee not less than seven (7) nor more than fourteen (14) days thereafter unless the person is returned to the department of correction before the scheduled hearing date.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 34; 1989, ch. 278, § 33; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 43-45; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6; 2010, ch. 1100, § 38; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

33-3-404. Transfer committees — Appointment of members.

A transfer committee consists of five (5) persons. If the person to be transferred is in the custody of the department of children's services, the commissioner of children's services shall appoint two (2) members of the committee, neither of whom may be the transferring chief officer. If the person to be transferred is in the custody of the department of correction, the commissioner of correction shall appoint two (2) members of the committee, neither of whom may be the transferring director. The commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services or the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, as appropriate, shall appoint three (3) members to review transfers of adults and two (2) members to review transfers of children. The executive director of the state commission on children and youth or the director's designee shall be a member of a transfer committee that reviews transfers of children. The committee members shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing commissioners. The commissioners may appoint alternate committee members.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 34; 1989, ch. 278, § 31; 1996, ch. 1079, § 47; 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 39; 2012, ch. 575, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Commission on children and youth, title 37, ch. 3, part 1.

33-3-405. Transfer committee — Chair — Vice chair — Voting — Hearings — Rights of transferees — Evidence.

The committee may elect a chair and a vice chair. The committee shall act by majority vote. No member of the committee is disqualified to participate in a hearing by virtue of prior knowledge of the case. The chair may postpone the hearing for a reasonable time upon request of the person whose transfer is proposed to permit that person to obtain counsel and witnesses. In the hearing, the committee shall receive all relevant evidence. The transferee shall be permitted to speak personally and by counsel and to present witnesses.

Transfer committee proceedings under this part are not governed by the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 34; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-406. Approval or disapproval of transfer.

If the committee determines that the transfer meets the standards for a transfer under this part, it shall approve the transfer. The chair shall immediately give the person written notice of the committee's decision and a summary of the factual basis for the decision and a complaint form for review of the transfer in the circuit court under part 7 of this chapter.

If the transfer committee determines that the transfer does not meet the standards for a transfer under this part, it shall disapprove the transfer, and if the person has already been transferred, shall order the person returned to the transferring facility. The chair shall immediately give the person written notice of the committee's decision and a summary of the factual basis for the decision.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 34; 1989, ch. 513, § 6; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-407. When person to be transferred.

The person shall be transferred five (5) days after the receipt of the committee's notice if the person has not filed a complaint under part 7 of this chapter.

The person may be transferred immediately after receipt of the notice if the person is competent and consents in writing to the transfer.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 34; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-408. Determination of appropriateness of transfer.

Within five (5) days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after any transfer made without objection by the transferee under § 33-3-401 or § 33-3-402, or any transfer under § 33-3-403, the chief officer of the receiving facility of the department shall determine whether the transfer was appropriate under this part. If the transfer was based on mental illness or serious emotional disturbance, the chief officer's decision shall be based on the advice of a licensed physician. If the transfer was based on intellectual disability, the chief officer's decision shall be based on the advice of a licensed physician or a licensed psychologist with health service provider designation.

If the chief officer determines that the transfer of a person in the custody of the department of correction was not appropriate, the chief officer shall immediately transfer the person back to the custody of the department of correction.

If the chief officer of the receiving department facility determines that the transfer of a person in the custody of the department of children's services was not appropriate, the chief officer shall immediately transfer the person back to the youth development center or other appropriate program designated by the commissioner of children's services.

If the chief officer determines that the transfer was appropriate, the chief officer shall immediately give the person written notice of the decision.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 34; 1987, ch. 143, § 2; 1989, ch. 278, § 33; 1989, ch. 513, § 7; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 48, 49; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6; 2004, ch. 565, § 7; 2010, ch. 734, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

33-3-409. Return of transferee from public facility.

If the chief officer of a receiving facility of the department or, upon approval by the commissioner, the chief officer of a private facility that operates a program for the department determines more than five (5) days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after a person has been transferred, that a person no longer meets the standards for a transfer under this part or that residential care and treatment in the facility are no longer advisable or beneficial, the chief officer shall order the person's return to the department of correction or the department of children's services.

The chief officer shall notify the person of the decision in writing not less than seventy-two (72) hours in advance of the proposed transfer. If the person does not object within seventy-two (72) hours of the notice to the proposed return, the person shall be returned to the department of correction or the department of children's services. If the person objects within seventy-two (72) hours of the notice, the chief officer shall convene a transfer committee to review the decision not less than seven (7) days nor more than fourteen (14) days thereafter. The person shall remain at the facility pending the decision of the transfer committee.

If the transfer committee determines that the person no longer meets the standards for a transfer under this part or that residential care and treatment in the facility are no longer advisable or beneficial, it shall approve the transfer.

The decision of a transfer committee approving or disapproving a transfer under this section is final. The judicial remedy and procedures under part 7 of this chapter do not apply to the transfer committee decision.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 34; 1988, ch. 828, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, § 33; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 8-12; 1996, ch. 1079, § 50; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-3-410. Return of transferee from private facility.

If the chief officer of a private facility that operates a program for the department determines that residential care and treatment of a transferee in the facility are no longer advisable or beneficial, the chief officer shall notify the transferee and the commissioner of the determination and of the basis for it.

If the commissioner, after receipt of the notice, determines that an emergency exists and that the determination appears to be correct, the commissioner shall order the transfer immediately to a facility of the department. Within seven (7) days after the transfer, the commissioner shall have a transfer committee composed only of three (3) persons appointed by the commissioner hold a hearing to determine whether residential care and treatment of a transferee in the transferring facility are no longer advisable or beneficial. If the committee determines that the chief officer was correct, it shall approve the transfer. Otherwise, the committee shall order the person returned to the transferring facility or to another appropriate facility.

If the commissioner, after receipt of the notice, determines that an emergency does not exist and that the determination appears to be correct, the commissioner shall have a transfer committee composed only of three (3) persons appointed by the commissioner hold a hearing not less than seven (7) nor more than fourteen (14) days after receipt of the notice to determine whether residential care and treatment of a transferee in the transferring facility are no longer advisable or beneficial. If the committee determines that the chief officer was correct, it shall approve the transfer. Otherwise, the committee shall disapprove the transfer. The person shall remain in the transferring facility until the committee has made its determination.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 34; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-3-411. Runaways — Custody.

If a transferee runs away from a department facility or a program that is operated by a private contractor for the department and is taken into custody within thirty (30) days after running away, the transferee shall be returned to the custody of the commissioner at a facility designated by the commissioner. If a transferee runs away from the facility or program and is taken into custody more than thirty (30) days after running away, the department that initiated the transfer shall designate a facility or program at which the transferee shall be returned to the custody of the transferring department.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 34; 1989, ch. 278, §§ 32, 33; 1996, ch. 1079, § 51; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-3-412. Emergency residential care and treatment for minors in youth development centers.

The chief officer of a youth development center shall immediately have a person transferred to a facility of the department designated by the commissioner, if the chief officer of the youth development center of the department of children’s services determines, on the basis of a written report of a licensed physician or a licensed psychologist designated as a health service provider, that the person in the youth development center:

Has a serious emotional disturbance or mental illness; and

Is in need of emergency residential care and treatment for the condition that cannot be provided at the youth development center and that can be provided by an appropriate residential program of the department.

When a person in the custody of the department of children's services is transferred to a facility of the department under this section, the chief officer of the receiving facility shall convene a transfer committee not less than seven (7) nor more than fourteen (14) days thereafter, unless the person is returned to the youth development center or other appropriate program of the department of children's services before the scheduled hearing date.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 46; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6; 2010, ch. 1100, § 24.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.